Hawaii, session 2026, GM1228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that pursuant to Act 156,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, the department of education is
required to establish a harm to students registry. The
legislature further finds that clarifying the scope of the
registry by including contractors and volunteers only if their
roles involve interaction with students, and by excluding K-12
students, will reduce unnecessary complexity and administrative
burdens while maintaining a safe learning environment for
students.
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to clarify which
individuals are covered under the harm to students registry to
ensure both efficiency and student safety.
SECTION 2. Section 302A-1006, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-E-]§3O2A-1OO6[^] Harm to students registry; requirements;
due process; immunity. (a) The department shall establish a
harm to students registry, which shall be a database of
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO
iiinniiWHiniiiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
employees found to have inflicted harm on a student in the
State. The harm to students registry shall contain:
(1) The employee’s full legal name and any prior names
used, such as maiden name or married name;
(2) The employee’s date of birth;
(3) The employee's photograph;
(4) The employee’s last known address; and
(5) The name of the reporting institution.
(b) The reporting institution shall certify to the
department that any employee whose name and information has been
transmitted to the department for inclusion on the harm to
students registry has been afforded appropriate due process, as
set forth in this section.
(c) The reporting institution shall certify that there has
been a final finding, including the date of the institution’s
final finding, resulting from the institution’s investigation
into whether the institution’s employee engaged in acts or
omissions that resulted in the infliction of harm to a student,
notwithstanding whether the employee was terminated, retired,
resigned, or was banned from the school pending completion of
the investigation. Each institution shall complete an
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO

H.B. NO.
^2
C.D. 1
investigation without regard to the employment status of the
employee under investigation or the status of the employee's
future involvement with the institution.
(d) For the purposes of this section, in order for an
employee's name to be placed on the harm to students registry,
the investigation conducted by the reporting institution that
rendered a final finding of infliction of harm to a student
shall involve, at a minimum:
(!) An investigator who was not a party or witness to the
incident under investigation and who does not report
to a complaining party or accused party;
(2) An opportunity for the complaining party and accused
party to provide information to the investigator
regarding the alleged misconduct or other
circumstances that caused initiation of the
investigation;
(3) Representation for the accused party if required by
law or any applicable collective bargaining agreement;
provided that the department shall not provide
representation for an accused party that is not
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
entitled to representation pursuant to a collective
bargaining agreement;
(4) Consideration of the information provided by all
parties and witnesses who participated in the
investigation; and
(5) Reasoned findings based on the information gathered
that support the conclusion, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the accused party inflicted harm on a
student.
(e) The reporting institution shall certify, before
transmitting the employee's name and other information to the
department, that:
(1) The employee whose name is transmitted to the
department for inclusion on the harm to students
registry was given prior written notice of the
institution's decision to transmit the employee's name
for this purpose;
(2) The employee was given the opportunity to appeal the
decision; and
(3) The employee either waived the right to appeal or lost
the appeal.
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The department shall rely on an institution's certification
that the employee was provided due process in accordance with
this section.
(f) Each institution in the State, when requested by
another institution, shall share with that institution the
existence of any employee investigation that includes
allegations of infliction of harm to a student, including
ongoing investigations.
(g) An institution that provides information or an opinion
about an employee's job performance to a prospective employing
institution shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and
shall have qualified immunity from civil or criminal liability
for disclosing the information and for the consequences of the
disclosure.
(h) The good faith presumption under subsection (g) shall
be rebuttable upon a showing, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the information or opinion disclosed was:
(1) Knowingly false; or
(2) Knowingly misleading.
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO

iiiiiniiiiniiiiiiiiiiii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(i) Nothing in subsections (g) and (h) shall affect the
rights, obligations, remedies, liabilities, or standards of
proof under chapters 89, 92F, 368, and 378.
(j) The harm to students registry shall be made accessible
to all institutions within the State.
(k) A person whose name is listed on the harm to students
registry may request-the reporting institution to submit a
certified request to the department to remove the person's name
from the registry if hew information is discovered that proves
that the person has not inflicted harm on a student such that
the person's name does not belong on the registry. The
department shall remove the person's name from the harm to
students registry upon receiving a certified request from the
reporting institution to remove the person’s name from the
registry.
(1) Any institution certifying the inclusion of an
employee on or removal of an employee from the harm to students
registry, or refusing to certify the removal of an employee from
the harm to students registry, shall defend and indemnify the
department from any liability resulting from any claim or cause
of action relating to the employee's inclusion on or removal
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO
lillHIRiilllllllllHHIII

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
from the registry, or relating to the institution's refusal to
certify the removal of the employee from the registry.
(m) As part of the procedures followed pursuant to section
302A-601.5, the department shall consult the harm to students
registry to determine whether a candidate for employment is
listed on the registry.
(n) The department shall consult the harm to students
registry before authorizing a volunteer's assistance in a role
that involves the volunteer's interaction with, or close
proximity to, a student or students.
(o) If a candidate for employment or a potential
volunteer's name is listed on the harm to students registry, the
department shall cease to consider the candidate for employment
or shall prohibit the volunteer's assistance in a role that
involves interaction with, or close proximity to, a student or
students.
(p) The harm to students registry shall be exempt from
disclosure under chapter 92F.
(q) An individual enrolled as a student at an institution
at the time of employment shall be exempt from this section.
[-(-q)-] (r) As used in this section:
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO 7

Page 8
H.B. NO.
^0^
C.D. 1
"Employee" means a person currently or formerly employed by
[the] institution and includes [centreactors and volunteers]
any contractor or volunteer for [ae] the institution[—] who
performs any role that involves interaction with a student.
"Final finding" means the conclusion of an institution's
investigation that results in a determination by the
institution.
"Harm to students registry" or "registry" means a database
of employees and any related documents compiled by the
department that a reporting institution certifies and transmits
to the department.
"Inflicted harm on a student" or "infliction of harm on a
student" means the act of subjecting a student to abusive acts
or sexual exploitation, whether with, to, or in the presence of
a student, including any:
(1) Sexual act;
(2) Solicitation of a sexual act, whether written, visual,
verbal, or physical;
(3) Inappropriate sexual contact or conduct, whether
written, visual, verbal, or physical;
(4) Act of child abuse;
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO


Page 9 2293
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(5) Intentional solicitation, encouragement, or
consummation of a romantic or physical relationship,
which includes dating a student; or
(6) Acts of abuse or violence, including assault, torture,
or physical punishment or restraint that results in
serious bodily injury.
"Institution" means any public or private educational
institution that services students in early learning programs or
schools, and from kindergarten through twelfth grade within the
State.
"Investigation" means any fact finding by an institution
relating to an accusation of infliction of harm on a student
that meets the requirements of subsection (d)."
SECTION 3. Section 302C-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
"(1) As used in this section:
"Department" means the department of education.
"Employee" has the same meaning as defined in section
302A-10Q6 (r) .
"Final finding" has the same meaning as defined in section
302A-1006 (r) .
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO

■IMHIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 10 2293
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Harm to students registry" or "registry" has the same
meaning as defined in section [3-Q2A-1006 (q) . ] 302A-1006 (r) .
"Inflicted harm on a student" or "infliction of harm on a
student" has the same meaning as defined in section [302A-
1006(q).] 302A-1006(r).
"Institution" has the same meaning as defined in section
[302A-1006(q).] 302A-1006(r).
"Investigation" has the same meaning as defined in section
[302A-1006-(q)-. ] 302A-1006 (r) . "
SECTION 4. Section 302D-33.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
"(1) As used in this section:
"Department" means department of education.
"Employee" has the same meaning as defined in section
[3Q2A -1006 (q) . ] 302A-1006 (r) .
"Final finding" has the same meaning as defined in section
[302A-1006(q).] 302A-1006(r).
"Harm to students registry" or "registry" has the same
meaning as defined in section [3O2A-1006(q).] 302A-1006(r).
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO 10
llinillNiNIHillBlli

Page 11 2293
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Inflicted harm on a student" or "infliction of harm on a
student" has the same meaning as defined in section [302A-
1006(q)^] 302A-1006(r).
"Institution" has the same meaning as defined in section
[302A-10Q-6-(-q) . ] 302A-1006 (r) .
"Investigation" has the same meaning as defined in section
[302A-1006(q).] 302A-1006(r)."
SECTION 5. Section 302L-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
"(1) As used in this section:
"Department" means the department of education.
"Employee" has the same meaning as defined in section
[302-A-l-e-Q6 (q) . ] 302A-1006 (r) .
"Final finding" has the same meaning as defined in section
[302A-1006(q).] 302A-1006(r).
"Harm to students registry" or "registry" has the same
meaning as defined in section [302A-1006(q).] 302A-1006(r).
"Inflicted harm on a student" or "infliction of harm on a
student" has the same meaning as defined in section [302A-
1006 (q^^] 302A-1006 (r) .
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO

IlllllllllillilillW

Page 12 2293
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Institution" has the same meaning as defined in section
302A-1006 (r) .
"Investigation" has the same meaning as defined in section
[302A-1006(q).] 302A-1006(r)."
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3302 HB2293 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiffliiiiiiiiNiiini

H.B. NO. 2293
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2293, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2293, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
71-26